South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4691.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 6, Title 44 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 44-6-120.  Any facility deemed an abortion clinic as defined by Section 44-41-75, and any affiliated physicians or professional medical practices, must be deemed unqualified to provide family planning services as part of the South Carolina Medicaid program pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Section 1396a(a)(23)(A). Accordingly, the South Carolina Department of Health and Human Services may not direct Medicaid funds for family planning services to any organizations providing abortion services, as these organizations are not qualified to participate in the South Carolina Medicaid program. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----